Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.005

Intent.

The legislature intends that this chapter, and any rules, regulations, or orders promulgated pursuant hereto, apply to transactions in commodities which constitute commodity contracts or commodity options as defined in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 1987 c 243 s 1.]